Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2259
State long-term care ombudsman and ombudsman advocate; access to resident.

A state long-term care ombudsman or an ombudsman advocate shall have immediate access to any consenting resident for the purpose of effectively carrying out the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Act if such state long-term care ombudsman or ombudsman advocate identifies himself or herself and presents his or her credentials to the individual in charge of the long-term care facility.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 22;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 21.
April 12, 2018